chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число
%{A%}		     ! archiphoneme placeholder
%{Ă%}		     ! genetive archiphoneme
%{м%}		     ! genetive plural morpheme
%<nom%>              ! Именительный падеж
%<ins%>              ! Творительный падеж
%<gen%>		     ! Genetive Case

%>                   ! Граница морфемы

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 

LEXICON CASES 

%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;
%<gen%>:%>%{Ǎ%}н # ;

LEXICON PLURAL

             CASES ; 
%<pl%>:%>се%{м%} CASES ;

LEXICON N 

%<n%>: PLURAL ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;     ! "улица"
пакча:пакча N ;   ! "сад"
хула:хула N ;     ! "город"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет"
